Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2908
District; voter approval; board of trustees; how appointed; officers.

If the voters approve the formation and boundaries of the district, permanent organization shall be effected by the appointment by the county board of a board of trustees consisting of five residents of the district if the district includes territory in five townships or less. If the district embraces or includes territory in more than five townships, each township shall be represented on the board of trustees by one trustee who shall be a resident of the township. All trustees shall be appointed for two years and hold office until their successors have been appointed, except at the first appointment at least two trustees shall be appointed for one-year terms. The board of trustees shall organize by electing a president, vice president, and secretary-treasurer from the members of the board for a term of one year. All officers shall serve without pay.

Laws 1977, LB 29, § 8.